Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2441.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XII heading of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:ARTICLE XII.CERTIFICATION OF TEACHERS AND OTHER PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYES.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1222. Educational Specialist Experience-Based Certification.--(a) In addition to other requirements promulgated by the State Board of Education, the Department of Education shall issue an educational specialist experience-based certificate to an individual seeking a position as a school 1234567891011121314151617181920 counselor or school nurse in the public schools of this Commonwealth if the individual presents any of the following:(1) For a nurse:(i) Completion of an approved registered nursing program, or an equivalent program approved by a State Board of Nursing.(ii) Completion of three (3) hours of approved training in how to recognize and report child abuse.(iii) Passage of the National Council Licensure Examination or its predecessor, the State Board Test Pool Examination.(iv) Being current on the thirty (30) hours of continuing education, which must include two (2) hours of approved training in how to recognize and report child abuse.(2) For a counselor:(i) Holding a master's degree or doctoral degree in counseling or a field determined by the State Board of Education by regulation to be closely related to the practice of professional counseling from an accredited educational institution.(ii) Passage of one of the following examinations:(A) The National Counselor Examination for Licensure and Certification given by the National Board for Certified Counselors.(B) The Certified Rehabilitation Counselor Examination given by the Commission on Rehabilitation Counselor Certification.(C) The Art Therapy Credentials Board Certification Examination given by the Art Therapy Credentials Board.(D) The Board Certification Examination given by the Certification Board for Music Therapists.(E) The Practice Examination of Psychological Knowledge given by the North American Association of Master's in 20260HB2441PN3249 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Psychology.(F) The Advanced Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Counselor Examination given by the International Certification and Reciprocity Consortium/Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse, Inc.(G) The Examination for Master Addictions Counselors given by the National Board for Certified Counselors.(iii) Experience as follows:(A) For a master's degree, at least three thousand (3,000) hours of supervised clinical experience completed in no less than two (2) years and no more than six (6) years.(B) For a doctoral degree, at least two thousand four hundred (2,400) hours of supervised clinical experience, of which one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours was obtained subsequent to the granting of the doctoral degree.(iv) Being current on the thirty (30) hours of continuing education in acceptable courses and programs offered by approved providers. The thirty (30) hours shall include at least three (3) hours in ethics, two (2) hours of the mandated Act 31 child abuse reporter training and one (1) hour in suicide prevention.(b) The educational specialist experience-based certificate shall be issued for the period of time needed by an individual to complete sixty (60) credit hours for a school counselor or twenty-four (24) credit hours for a registered nurse in an approved educational specialist preparation program, but in no case may the period of time exceed five (5) years from the date of issuance.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2441PN3249 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627